District of Columbia statutes.
2-223.04

Disciplinary action; fine.

(a)

As part of the relief ordered in an administrative, arbitral or judicial proceeding, a supervisor employed by a District instrumentality who is found to have violated § 2-223.02 shall be subject to appropriate disciplinary action, up to and including dismissal.

(b)

As part of the relief ordered in a judicial proceeding, a supervisor employed by a District instrumentality who is found to have violated § 2-223.02 shall be subject to a civil fine not to exceed $1000.

History

Oct. 7, 1998, D.C. Law 12-160, § 205, 45 DCR 5147
Nov. 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-187, § 201(c), 53 DCR 6722

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1177.4.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-187 substituted “a supervisor employed by a District instrumentality” for “any supervisor” throughout the section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 2-223.01.